src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/pronoun-gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each pronoun:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# Pronouns belonging to MUNLEX, DONLEX, SONLEX, GUHTELEX, demcase, Dahtanaga-par, DAKKAR, IESLEX, GUHTEMUSLEX, MIIINTERLEX, nubbicase, JUOBBA, indef-a-uneven, indef-a-uneven-gahpir, indef-a-uneven, oblintercas_indef, indefdeclpleven, EARRAS, SEAMMA, JUOGA, OVTTAHAT

Tests:
  Pron - mun: # MUNLEX
    mun+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Ill: munnje
    mun+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Ess: munin
    mun+Pron+Pers+Du1+Acc: munno
    mun+Pron+Pers+Du1+Loc: munnos
    mun+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Ill: midjiide
    mun+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Com: minguin

  Pron - don: # DONLEX
    don+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Ill: dutnje
    don+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Ess: dunin
    don+Pron+Pers+Du2+Acc: dudno
    don+Pron+Pers+Du2+Loc: dudnos
    don+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Ill: didjiide
    don+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Com: dinguin

  Pron - son: # SONLEX
    son+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Ill: sutnje
    son+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Ess: sunin
    son+Pron+Pers+Du3+Acc: sudno
    son+Pron+Pers+Du3+Loc: sudnos
    son+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Ill: sidjiide
    son+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Com: singuin
    

  Pron - guhte: # GUHTELEX
    guhte+Pron+Rel+Sg+Nom: guhte
    guhte+Pron+Rel+Sg+Acc: guđe
    guhte+Pron+Rel+Sg+Gen: guđe
    guhte+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ill: guhtii
    guhte+Pron+Rel+Sg+Loc: guđes
    guhte+Pron+Rel+Sg+Com: guđiin
    guhte+Pron+Rel+Pl+Nom: guđet
    guhte+Pron+Rel+Pl+Gen: guđiid
    guhte+Pron+Rel+Pl+Ill: guđiide
    guhte+Pron+Rel+Pl+Com: guđiiguin

  Pron - dat: # demcase
    dat+Pron+Dem+Sg+Nom: dat
    dat+Pron+Dem+Sg+Acc: dan
    dat+Pron+Dem+Sg+Gen: dan
    dat+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ill: dasa
    dat+Pron+Dem+Sg+Loc: das
    dat+Pron+Dem+Sg+Com: dainna
    dat+Pron+Dem+Pl+Nom: dat
    dat+Pron+Dem+Pl+Gen: daid
    dat+Pron+Dem+Pl+Ill: daidda
    dat+Pron+Dem+Pl+Com: daiguin

  Pron - dahtanaga: # Dahtanaga-par
    dahtanaga+Pron+Dem+Sg+Nom: dahtanaga
    dahtanaga+Pron+Dem+Sg+Acc: dammanaga
    dahtanaga+Pron+Dem+Sg+Gen: dammanaga
    dahtanaga+Pron+Dem+Sg+Ill: dasanaga
    dahtanaga+Pron+Dem+Sg+Loc: dasttánaga
    dahtanaga+Pron+Dem+Sg+Com: dainnanaga
    dahtanaga+Pron+Dem+Pl+Ill: daiddanaga
    dahtanaga+Pron+Dem+Pl+Loc: dainnanaga

  Pron - duokkár: # DAKKAR
    duokkár+Pron+Dem+Attr: duokkár
    duokkár+Pron+Dem+Sg+Loc: duokkáris
    duokkár+Pron+Dem+Pl+Nom: duokkárat
    duokkár+Pron+Dem+Pl+Com: duokkáriiguin
    
  Pron - ieš: # IESLEX
    ieš+Pron+Refl+Du+Nom: ieža
    ieš+Pron+Refl+Gen+PxPl2: iežadet
    ieš+Pron+Refl+Ill+PxSg3: [alccesis, allasis]
    ieš+Pron+Refl+Ill+PxDu3: [alcceseaskka, allaseaskka]
    ieš+Pron+Refl+Loc+PxPl1: alddiineamet
    ieš+Pron+Refl+Com+PxPl3: iežaineaset
    
  Pron - guhtemuš: # GUHTEMUSLEX
    guhtemuš+Pron+Rel+Sg+Nom: [guhtemuš, guđemuš]
    guhtemuš+Pron+Rel+Sg+Gen: guđemučča
    guhtemuš+Pron+Rel+Ess:    guđemužžan
    guhtemuš+Pron+Rel+Pl+Ill: guđemuččaide
    
  Pron - mihkkege: # MIIINTERLEX
    mihkke+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom+Foc/Neg-ge: [mihkkege, mihkkige]
    mihkke+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen+Foc/Neg-ge: mange
    mihkke+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc+Foc/Neg-ge: [maidege, maidige, mange]
    mihkke+Pron+Indef+Sg+Loc+Foc/Neg-ge: [mastege, mastige, masge]
    mihkke+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom+Foc/Neg-ge: [mahkkege, mahkkige, mahttege, mahttige]
    
  Pron - nubbi: # nubbicase
    nubbi+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: nubbi
    nubbi+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc: nuppi
    nubbi+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen: nuppi
    nubbi+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill: nubbái
    nubbi+Pron+Indef+Sg+Loc: nuppis
    nubbi+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com: nuppiin
    nubbi+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom: nuppit
    nubbi+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen: nuppiid
    nubbi+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ill: nuppiide
    nubbi+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com: nuppiiguin
    
  Pron - juobbá: # JUOBBA
    juobbá+Pron+Rel+Sg+Nom: juobbá
    juobbá+Pron+Rel+Sg+Acc: juoppá
    juobbá+Pron+Rel+Sg+Gen: juoppá
    juobbá+Pron+Rel+Sg+Ill: juobbái
    juobbá+Pron+Rel+Sg+Loc: juoppás
    juobbá+Pron+Rel+Sg+Com: juoppáin
    juobbá+Pron+Rel+Pl+Nom: juoppát
    juobbá+Pron+Rel+Pl+Gen: juoppáid
    juobbá+Pron+Rel+Pl+Ill: juoppáide
    juobbá+Pron+Rel+Pl+Com: juoppáiguin

    
  Pron - eanas: # indef-a-uneven
    eanaš+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: eanas
    eanaš+Pron+Indef+Sg+Loc: eatnasis
    eanaš+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen: eatnasiid
    eanaš+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com: eatnasiiguin
    
  Pron - veaháš: # indef-a-uneven-gahpir
    veaháš+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: veaháš
    veaháš+Pron+Indef+Sg+Loc: veahážis
    veaháš+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen: veahážiid
    veaháš+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com: veahážiiguin
    
  Pron - juobbá: # indef-a-uneven
    juobbá+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: juobbá
    juobbá+Pron+Indef+Sg+Loc: juoppás
    juobbá+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen: juoppáid
    juobbá+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com: juoppáiguin

  Pron - juogamii: # oblintercas_indef
    juogamii+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: juogamii
    juogamii+Pron+Indef+Sg+Loc: juogamas
    juogamii+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen: juogamaid
    juogamii+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com: juogamaiguin

  Pron - buotdivnnat: # indefdeclpleven
    buotdivnnat+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom: buotdivnnat
    buotdivnnat+Pron+Indef+Pl+Loc: buotdivnnain
    buotdivnnat+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen: buotdivnnaid
    buotdivnnat+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com: buotdivnnaiguin
    
  Pron - earrás: # EARRAS
#   earrása+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: earrás # Får ikkje analyse lenger
    earrása+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc: earrása
    earrása+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen: earrása
    earrása+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill: earrásii
    earrása+Pron+Indef+Sg+Loc: earrásis
    earrása+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com: earrásiin
    earrása+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom: earrásat
    earrása+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen: earrásiid
#   earrása+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ill: earrásiide # Får ikkje analyse lenger
    earrása+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com: earrásiiguin
    
  Pron - seammá: # SEAMMA
    seammá+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: seammá
    seammá+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc: seammá
    seammá+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen: seammá
    seammá+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill: seammái
#   seammá+Pron+Indef+Sg+Loc: seammás # Denne forma får ikkje slik analyse lenger
    seammá+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com: seammáin
    seammá+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom: seammát
    seammá+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen: seammáid
#   seammá+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ill: seammáide # heller ikkje denne
#   seammá+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com: seammáiguin # og ikkje denne
    
  Pron - juoga: # JUOGA
    juoga+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: juoga
    juoga+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc: [juoidá, juoga]
    juoga+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen: juoga
    juoga+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill: juosat
    juoga+Pron+Indef+Sg+Loc: juostá
    juoga+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com: juoidáin
    juoga+Pron+Indef+Pl+Acc: juoidáid

  Pron - oktahat: # OVTTAHAT
    oktahat+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: oktahat
    oktahat+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc: ovttahaga
    oktahat+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen: ovttahaga
    oktahat+Pron+Indef+Sg+Ill: ovttahahkii
    oktahat+Pron+Indef+Sg+Loc: ovttahagas
    oktahat+Pron+Indef+Sg+Com: ovttahagain
    oktahat+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom: ovttahagat
    oktahat+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen: ovttahagaid
    oktahat+Pron+Indef+Pl+Ill: ovttahagaide
    oktahat+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com: ovttahagaiguin
